Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Chapter 15

Policy on Granting Comity to Foreign Law, Legal Code or System

20-15-101. Chapter definition.

As used in this chapter, “foreign law, legal code, or system” means any law, legal code, or system of a jurisdiction outside of any state or territory of the United States, including, but not limited to, international organizations and tribunals, and applied by that jurisdiction's courts, administrative bodies, or other formal or informal tribunals.

Acts 2010, ch. 983, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning recognizing the right to contract freely under the laws of this state, but also recognizing that this right may be reasonably and rationally circumscribed pursuant to the state's interest to protect and promote rights and privileges granted under the United States or Tennessee Constitutions, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 983.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 983, § 8. May 27, 2010.

20-15-102. Public policy.

It is the public policy of this state that the primary factor which a court, administrative agency, arbitrator, mediator or other entity or person acting under the authority of state law shall consider in granting comity to a decision rendered under any foreign law, legal code or system against a natural person in this state is whether the decision rendered either violated or would violate any right of the natural person in this state guaranteed by the Tennessee Constitution or the United States Constitution or any statute or decision under those constitutions.

Acts 2010, ch. 983, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 983, § 8. May 27, 2010.

20-15-103. Primary factor in interpretation, enforcement or application of agreement providing for choice of foreign law, legal code or system is preservation of constitutional rights.

If any contract, arbitration agreement or other agreement provides for the choice of a foreign law, legal code or system to govern its interpretation or the resolution of any claim or dispute and if the enforcement or interpretation of the contract, arbitration agreement or other agreement applying that choice of law provision either resulted or would result in a violation of any right guaranteed by the Tennessee Constitution or the United States Constitution, then it is the public policy of this state that the primary factor in interpretation, enforcement or application of the contract, arbitration agreement or other agreement shall be preservation of the constitutional rights of the natural person in this state against whom enforcement is sought, unless otherwise directed by state statute.

Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to limit the right of a natural person of this state to voluntarily restrict or limit their own constitutional rights by contract or specific waiver consistent with constitutional principles; however, the language of any such contract or other waiver shall be strictly construed in favor of preserving the constitutional rights of the natural person in this state.

Acts 2010, ch. 983, § 3.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 983, § 8. May 27, 2010.

20-15-104. Choice of venue or forum.

If any contract, arbitration agreement or other agreement provides for the choice of venue or forum outside any state or territory of the United States and if the enforcement or interpretation of the contract, arbitration agreement or other agreement applying that choice of venue or forum provision either resulted or would result in a violation of any right of a natural person in this state guaranteed by the Tennessee Constitution or the United States Constitution, then it is the public policy of this state that, in interpreting or construing the contract or arbitration agreement or other agreement, the primary factor to be considered is whether it can be interpreted or construed to preserve the constitutional rights of the natural person in this state against whom enforcement is sought.

If a natural person of this state, subject to personal jurisdiction in this state, seeks to maintain litigation, arbitration, agency or similarly binding proceedings in this state and if the courts of this state find that granting a claim of forum non conveniens or a related claim violates or would likely violate the constitutional rights of the non-claimant in the foreign forum with respect to the matter in dispute, then it is the public policy of this state that the claim shall be denied.

Acts 2010, ch. 983, § 4.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 983, § 8. May 27, 2010.

Law Reviews.

Aligning Law and Forum: The Home Court Advantage, 81 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (2013).

20-15-105. Application to various forms of business association.

Without prejudice to any other legal right, this chapter shall not apply to a corporation, partnership or other form of business association.

Acts 2010, ch. 983, § 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 983, § 8. May 27, 2010.

20-15-106.
Application to foreseeable violations of constitutional rights from foreign law, legal code or system.

The public policies expressed in this chapter shall apply only to actual or foreseeable violations of the constitutional rights of a natural person in this state from a foreign law, legal code or system.

Acts 2010, ch. 983, § 6.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 983, § 8. May 27, 2010.